Massachusetts, session 194th, H2548.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 8C as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 8C. The Commonwealth of Massachusetts forbids augmenting fluoride
concentrations in municipal water by the addition of fluoridation water additives
of 1